
STOP 



Early Journal Content on JSTOR, Free to Anyone in the World 

This article is one of nearly 500,000 scholarly works digitized and made freely available to everyone in 
the world by JSTOR. 

Known as the Early Journal Content, this set of works include research articles, news, letters, and other 
writings published in more than 200 of the oldest leading academic journals. The works date from the 
mid-seventeenth to the early twentieth centuries. 

We encourage people to read and share the Early Journal Content openly and to tell others that this 
resource exists. People may post this content online or redistribute in any way for non-commercial 
purposes. 

Read more about Early Journal Content at http://about.jstor.org/participate-jstor/individuals/early- 
journal-content . 



JSTOR is a digital library of academic journals, books, and primary source objects. JSTOR helps people 
discover, use, and build upon a wide range of content through a powerful research and teaching 
platform, and preserves this content for future generations. JSTOR is part of ITHAKA, a not-for-profit 
organization that also includes Ithaka S+R and Portico. For more information about JSTOR, please 
contact support@jstor.org. 



THE PARLIAMENTARY REGIME IN ITALY. 

A MARKED advance has been made in the study of 
physiology and anatomy by the introduction of the 
comparative method. It may even be asserted that it is 
impossible to understand human physiology and anatomy 
unless comparison is made between man and other animals. 
An analogous method of studying the physiology of the social 
organism leads to equally important results. It is by 
comparing civilized with savage society that modern sociol- 
ogists, following the traditions of inductive politics which have 
come down to us from Aristotle, have been able to lay the 
basis for a new science, whose progress during our century 
has been truly remarkable. The same method of study applied 
to the details of the organization of society ought also to be 
productive of great results. This is a truth of which M. L6on 
Donat shows thorough comprehension in his book on experi- 
mental politics ; and perhaps the day is not far off when the 
inductive method will acquire the same absolute mastery in 
political science that it already holds in physical science. It 
is from this point of view that a study of the effects of 
parliamentary rule in Italy appears to me worthy of consider- 
ation. If only the political phenomena which are due to 
specific and peculiar conditions in Italy can be separated from 
those which are due to general causes that might operate 
equally elsewhere, such an investigation promises to yield 
results of general validity and value. 

Two facts chiefly strike the observer who studies the 
politico-social condition of Italy. The first, which manifests 
itself on the most superficial examination, is the almost entire 
absence of political parties. The other, which to be thoroughly 
understood requires minute observation, is the enormous 
extension of the functions of the state, which reduces almost 
to nullity the private initiative and economic independence of 
the citizens. 



678 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

I. 

As to parties, these certainly exist, in name ; but the names 
serve only to designate bodies of men united by certain 
strictly personal interests or by a certain community of 
temperament. It is impossible to find any real difference 
between these nominal parties as regards their attitude towards 
the political and social problems with which the country is 
confronted. To this rule the extremists, indeed, constitute an 
exception ; but they are not at all numerous. Strictly speak- 
ing, there are three extreme parties, of which, however, one 
only is really active, namely, the Socialists. The Republican 
Party maintains a proud reserve, and as to the Clerical Party, 
it effaces itself entirely on the political stage. 

In Italy there are two kinds of socialism, of which one, 
agricultural socialism, is indigenous, while the other, indus- 
trial socialism, is only the reflection of French and, even 
more, of German ideas. This latter has its chief strength in 
Milan, which is industrially the most important city in Italy ; 
but it has some adherents in all the other centres of industry, 
such as Turin, Spezia and Genoa. The head of this party is 
the lawyer Turati, a resident of Milan, who publishes there two 
socialistic papers — a review entitled Critica Sociale (Social 
Criticism), and a small weekly paper called Lotta di Classe 
(Struggle of the Classes). This last name is sufficient to show 
that this party takes, in general, the point of view of Karl 
Marx. Turati is a man of much talent. He is well informed 
and active, and probably will yet play an important rdle in 
Italy. He has been lucky enough to make one important 
convert — Sig. de Amicis, the well-known novelist, who lives 
in Turin. The socialism of de Amicis, to tell the truth, does 
not go further than a vague desire for the amelioration of the 
lot of the people by collectivistic laws. He does not appear 
to have a very clear idea of the measures to be desired or of 
the effect which they would produce. But the simple fact 
that de Amicis has become a follower of the Socialists has 
increased their reputation and probably contributed, at the last 



No. 4.] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 679 

election, to the success of the Socialist candidate, Sig. Merlani. 
This election is very significant, as Merlani was opposed by 
General Pelloux, and Turin is a stronghold of the military 
party. In Milan the Socialist Party presented a very clear 
program — the contest of the masses against the bour- 
geoisie. Their candidates only registered a small number of 
votes. Turati had 352 out of 2,569 votes, while his chief 
opponent had 1,458. Another of their candidates, Sig. 
Gnocchi Viani, a clever man, obtained 620 out of 3,095 
votes. 

Agricultural socialism is spreading in the provinces of 
Mantua and Parma, and in some southern provinces, where it 
takes the form of a simple desire for the partition of the land. 
In former times its centre was in Romagna, but it now seems 
to have lost ground there. It was in Romagna that Cipriani, 
who was unjustly condemned and imprisoned by the Italian 
courts, was returned as a Socialist deputy. Under Crispi's 
ministry, it was thought well that the king should make a 
tour in Romagna, and, to mark the happy event, he was 
induced to pardon Cipriani. The king was well received by 
the people of Romagna ; and since then he has loaded 
popular societies with his favors, for which reason socialism is 
losing ground little by little. But in the southern provinces 
there is a real agrarian question. To understand it thoroughly 
we must retrace the course of their history a little. 

The revolution in Italy was chiefly the work of the 
bourgeois, who naturally sought to turn the new state of affairs 
to their own advantage wherever it was possible to do so. The 
north and centre of Italy were like other civilized countries in 
that the distinction of classes was not very definite ; and here 
it was not possible for one party of the bourgeoisie to enrich 
itself directly at the expense either of the other party or of the 
people. It was necessary to have recourse to the means which 
politicians employ in all countries, and which are based upon 
the intervention of the state. But in the southern provinces 
the bourgeois-, without renouncing these means, adopted others 
more direct, which caused their yoke to weigh very heavily 



680 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

upon the lower classes. They took possession of the communal 
administration and drew from it a profit visible to the eyes of 
all. In the ancient kingdom of Naples many large fortunes 
were formerly made by the misappropriation of the property 
of the communes. The liberal regime has changed the form 
but not the substance of these usurpations. In certain places 
the property of the commune is leased to figure-heads, or to 
the friends of the communal councilors, at ridiculous rents ; 
in others it is sold outright, and for next to nothing, to men of 
straw, all serious bidders being kept away from the auctions. 
The government does nothing to suppress these abuses, 
because the same persons who dominate the communal 
councils are the chief electors of the deputies, who, in their 
turn, employ their influence with the government to screen the 
misdeeds of their friends and partisans. 

The oppression of the people in the villages has led to 
frequent uprisings. Racioppi, in the tenth chapter of his 
Storia dei Moti della Basilicata nel i860, writes : 

The public land (ager publicus) has been occupied unjustly by the 
new bourgeois patricians. And this is how it happens that a man 
tries to gain justice with his own hands, while they whose duty 
it is to administer justice are deaf to his complaints and unmoved 
by his prayers. . . . Not finding the municipal representative, 
elected by the bourgeoisie, either very disinterested or very much 
concerned about social problems, the people endeavor to cut the 
Gordian knot by frequent insurrection. 

These seditions have continued up to the present time, and 
we have had some very recent examples of them at Forenza 
and at Caltavuturo. 1 

1 The outbreak at Forenza was attributed by the Minister of the Interior, in 
an address in the Chamber, February 22, 1892, to the establishment of a house- 
hold or family tax (tassa di fuocatico di famiglia), which is levied or not in a 
district according to the pleasure of the authorities of the commune. The deputy 
Giantureo, in replying, said : " The commune with which we have to deal was one 
of the richest in the Basilicata. A few years ago the council of the commune was 
dissolved, the royal commission having found that the serious charges of corrupt 
administration which had been brought against it were only too well grounded ; 
but, notwithstanding this, the same members were re-elected." 

Caltavuturo is a small commune in Sicily. The disturbance here, in which 



No. 4-] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 68 1 

The same oppression was one of the causes of brigandage. 1 
Brigands have disappeared, 2 but the oppression under which 
the people suffer has not much diminished. Here is what 
Sig. Leopoldo Franchetti wrote in 1875 of the bourgeois class 
which rules the Neapolitan communes : 

Such persons being entrusted with the administration of the public 
patrimony, it was to be expected that many among them would 
consider it merely a means to the increase of their private fortunes ; 
and in fact so prevalent is this idea that no attempt is made to 
conceal it, and when any one's financial affairs are in a bad con- 
dition it is not infrequent to hear it openly proposed that he should 
be elected to some office " to recoup himself." . . . The people in 
whose hands our laws apparently intend to place the local govern- 
ment are generally divided into two classes : those that have followed 
the lucrative career of local employees, and those who, while too 
honest to take part in these abuses, nevertheless do not prevent their 
occurrence. ... In this way councils and local boards, and the 
boards of administration of charitable institutions and " pious works " 
are often full of ruined people who make an income out of the 
public patrimony. . . . The corruption of the chiefs naturally 
communicates itself to their subordinates. The surveillance of the 
communal funds gives the guardians and other inferior employees the 
opportunity of making a quantity of little perquisites of a lucrative 
kind, all of which are a loss to the fund. Every usurper of communal 
property corrupts as much as his opportunities allow him — that is, up 
to a certain grade in the social scale, when power takes the place of 
money. . . . The crown prosecutor of Avezzano, in his speech of 
January 8, 1872, on the administration of justice (page 29), laments 
the rapid felling of the trees in the district, and says that the forest 
guards connive at depredations ; that they are so many Arguses in 
tracing the fagots which the poor man takes for himself, but are 

many lives were lost, arose out of an attempt by the peasants to assert possession 
of land which they claimed was communal property and had been usurped by 
private individuals. Signor Colajanni declared in the Chamber, January 30, 1893, 
that the peasants were right and that the legal proceedings showed that more 
than 100 hectares had been usurped. 

1 Cf. the work of Rossi on The Basilicata, page 571, where the career of Coppa, 
a most ferocious brigand, is thus explained. 

2 The disappearance of brigandage is due mainly to the excellent roads which 
now traverse the country. 



682 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

blind and dumb to the devastations that the rich make in the 
woods. 1 

In the rest of Italy many analogous facts occur; but the 
politician's art in stripping his fellow-citizens is there more 
refined, whereas in the Neapolitan communal administration 
it is brutally oppressive, and is the cause of an intense hatred 
for the bourgeoisie on the part of the poor people Their 
resentment has been ferociously manifested as often as the 
restraints of public force have been relaxed, and under 
similar circumstances we are likely to witness similar out- 
breaks. 

The Republican Party is composed of the remains of 
Mazzini's party. It is not large, but it consists almost 
exclusively of men whose honesty and straightforwardness 
are above suspicion. As a rule, it refuses to take part in the 
political elections, allowing its adherents, at most, to assist 
in communal elections only. The Fratellanza Artigiana of 
Florence, which preserves the purest Mazzinian traditions, is 
in favor of absolute abstention from voting. At the last 
elections (1892) it declared : 

It is a sacred duty of the democratic party to abstain from voting, 
abandoning forever a war which serves only to harden the hearts 
and intellects of young men, by upholding a system against which 
the only thing that could succeed would be an open and loyal war 
made by the people in the name of the people, claiming their rights. 
Remember, electors, what Giuseppe Mazzini said ! Whoever tries 
to perpetuate an institution which has had a death-blow is trying 
to do impossibilities. Galvanic action may simulate life for a brief 
moment, but cannot give it reality. 

1 Franchetti, The Economical and Administrative Conditions of the Neapolitan 
Provinces, pp. 28, 29. The author is a member of the majority, who almost always 
votes with the government, and is inclined to exaggerate the prosperity rather than 
the evil condition of the country. In political and social questions, as in courts of 
law, the testimony most worthy of confidence is that of persons who acknowledge 
facts contrary to their general mode of thinking, or who acknowledge their friends 
to be in the wrong. It is on testimony of this nature that I have tried as much 
as possible to rely, rejecting the testimony of persons who are speaking in favor 
of their friends and against their adversaries, 



No. 4.] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 683 

At Milan, however, a circumstance occurred which sent the 
Republicans to the ballot-box. Their candidate, Sig. de 
Andreis, was not elected, but he obtained 1 1 2 1 votes against 
1967 cast for his opponent, who was supported by the govern- 
ment. These 1 1 2 1 votes, however, were not all given by the 
Republicans ; many others voted for Sig. de Andreis, as a 
protest against governmental corruption and oppression. These 
facts tend to show how utterly null is the influence of the 
Republican Party in Italian political life. 

The influence of the Clerical Party is scarcely greater. It 
is said that the pope, when asked why he would not allow the 
faithful to vote, answered : " When one of our followers gets 
into Parliament we lose him." Whether these words were 
said or not, they are full of truth. Not only those who get into 
Parliament, but those who have employment under the govern- 
ment — and nearly all have — become lukewarm partisans. 
Persons well acquainted with the families of the most clerical 
of the Roman aristocracy maintain that if they were to vote 
secretly whether or no they would give Rome back to the pope, 
the negatives would be more numerous than the affirmatives, 
since these families would not risk losing the enormous increase 
of value which the removal of the capital to Rome has given 
to their houses. It is often said that when the Clerical Party 
does vote in Italy, a great change will take place in Italian 
political life. This is an error. In Rome the Clericals vote 
at the communal elections, and yet they do not succeed in 
getting possession of the municipal offices. When the Syndic 
of Rome, Torlonia, was removed from office for having paid 
a visit to the cardinal -vicar, they had not the courage 
even to protest. Nor do they protest now when it is pro- 
posed to hold an exhibition in Rome, and to open it on the 
anniversary of the taking of the city by the Italian troops. 
Owing to the fact that the Clerical electors in Rome are 
mostly small trades-people whom the exhibition would benefit, 
some municipal councilors belonging to the party even voted in 
favor of the exhibition, in spite of the date selected for its 
opening — an evidence of lukewarmness of which the pope 
complained bitterly. 



684 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

This last illustration brings us close to the limits where the 
confusion of Italian parties begins. In order to realize the 
degree of confusion that prevails, a comparison between 
English and American political leaders on the one hand, 
and Italian public men on the other, will be found service- 
able. 

In England and in the United States a certain connection is 
established between the names of public men and the ideas 
they represent ; so that it is sufficient, for example, to learn 
that Mr. Gladstone has obtained a majority at the elections in 
order to know that he will propose to solve the Irish question ; 
or to learn that the Democratic Party has triumphed in the 
United States under the leadership of Mr. Cleveland in order 
to infer that the country will not continue to increase its 
customs duties. With Italian politicians nothing of the sort 
is possible. For example, Sig. Minghetti fell from office 
because he proposed that the control of the railways should be 
given over to the state. His attitude on this question was not 
dictated by political exigencies ; it was the result of a life-long 
inclination on his part towards state socialism. He considered 
it absolutely indispensable for the good of the country to take 
away the railways from the plutocracy who owned them ; and 
to attain this end he did not hesitate to separate from his old 
companions who remained faithful to the liberal policy of 
Count Cavour, and thus to cause the dissolution of the old 
party of the Right. It would hence have been natural to 
suppose that this project would become the chief object of 
Sig. Minghetti's future efforts, as home rule has become that 
of Mr. Gladstone. Nothing of the sort. A very few years 
later, Sig. Minghetti was seen supporting a ministry, the 
chief point in whose program was the abandonment of the 
railways to private control. Further, Sig. Minghetti voted for 
a law which put the administration of the railways in the hands 
of a ring much worse than that which he had desired to 
destroy. Facts like these occur occasionally everywhere, but 
what is remarkable in Italy is that they are the general rule 
and that they seem quite natural. To realize this state 



No. 4-] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 685 

of things, the American or English reader must picture 
to himself a condition of feeling in England, for example, 
which would make it seem natural that the day after Mr. 
Gladstone had obtained office, Lord Salisbury should unite 
with him in laying before the House some bill to establish 
home rule in Ireland. And it is necessary to bear in mind 
that Sig. Minghetti was a perfectly honorable man, and that 
it would not enter any one's mind that he had other than 
honorable motives for his change of opinion. This, of course, 
is not always the case as regards the changes of opinion of 
other politicians. It is impossible to deny that in the case of 
many public men the desire for pecuniary advantage or for 
some satisfaction to their vanity counts for a great deal in 
their frequent changes of attitude. But whatever may be the 
motive for such changes, the Italian electors appear to regard 
them as natural, and show no disposition to hold their turn- 
coat representatives to a strict account. There were in the 
last Chamber, for instance, a certain number of deputies of 
the extreme Left, who one fine day decided to support the 
government, and who took the name of "Legitimate Radicals." 
These gentlemen had almost all obtained their seats as violent 
opponents of the Triple Alliance ; but on becoming friends 
of the government they became all at once partisans of the 
Triple Alliance and delivered speeches strongly contrasting 
with those which they had made before election. Notwith- 
standing this, the same electors re-elected them. This fact 
alone would not suffice to prove that the majority of the 
electors had become turncoats like their deputies, for in Italy 
the government exercises a great influence over the elections ; 
but a certain number of the electors, at least, must have 
changed their opinions. 

One result of this state of things, which is at the same time 
a proof of its prevalence, is the care with which many Italian 
public men avoid committing themselves. In order not to be 
embarrassed by the expression of their old opinions when the 
time may come to have new ones, they make a point of 
speaking in an ambiguous manner which recalls that of the 



686 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

ancient oracles. 1 One candidate, who was chosen at the last 
elections, said that he would support any government which 
had the welfare of the nation sincerely at heart, — a declaration 
which certainly threw little light upon the speaker's personal 
convictions. Not all candidates carry the method so far ; but 
in nearly all electoral programs phrases occur whose object 
is to avoid all precise treatment of the problems which are 
agitating the country. A candidate states, for example, that 
he " will vote for such military and naval expenditures as are 
necessary for the good of the country." This statement 
satisfies equally those people who believe that the good of the 
country requires an increase of these expenses, and those who 
believe that it is necessary, on the contrary, to curtail them. 
Another, following the program of Minister Giolitti, declares 
that he will not vote for new taxes unless they are absolutely 
necessary ; which evidently commits him in no way, since new 
taxes are invariably declared necessary by those who propose 
them. A similar vagueness characterizes many recent utter- 
ances on the tariff question. By the customs law of 1887 
Italy entered upon a policy of protection ; yet the authors 
of the tariff and their friends have never frankly called 
themselves protectionists, as M. Meline and his adherents 
have done in France. They represent the new system 
as an inevitable expedient under the conditions of the 
times, and they speak much of the natural law of free 
exchange, which is to guide economic policy when circum- 
stances make it possible. The lack of positive principle 
is illustrated by an incident during the discussion of the 
tariff law. Sig. Magliani, the Minister of Finance, at first 
declared himself opposed to a duty on foreign wheat (origi- 
nally three francs on the 100 kilos, and now five francs) ; 

1 [American readers will find nothing peculiarly Italian in this phenomenon. 
Many of them will involuntarily recall the utterances of Lowell's " Candidate for 
the Presidency," in the Biglom Papers, e.g. : 

" I stan' upon the Constitution, 

Ez preudunt statesmen say, who've planned 
A way to get the most profusion 

O' chances ez to ware they '11 stand." — Eds.] 



No. 4.] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 687 

but when it became evident that the defection of the so-called 
Agrarians, who desired such a duty, might destroy the protec- 
tionist majority, Magliani supported the proposal and made 
the House vote it. While the question was pending, Sig. 
Grimaldi, Minister of Commerce, who had not been advised 
of any change of view on the part of the ministry, made a 
speech at Colle Val d'Elsa, in which he said that "the 
ministry would never accept a tax on foreign grain." Only 
a few weeks after this speech the duty on wheat was proposed 
by the ministry, and the bill bore the signature of Sig. 
Grimaldi. 

Another consequence of this state of things is that, as a 
rule, the Italian electors have no platforms submitted to them, 
as in England or America. They are called upon to pronounce 
upon men, seldom on facts or events. There was an occasion 
lately (1890) when it seemed that a clear and definite question 
was to be laid before the country. The premier, Sig. Crispi, 
at least, had a program. He wished to follow a policy 
which was characterized as "imperial." According to Crispi, 
Italy was to become a great military and naval power, and was 
to play a rdle of great importance in the European political 
world. To carry out this policy the nation must make the 
necessary sacrifices ; it must not be niggardly in bearing taxes 
and incurring debts. Others — Sig. Jacini in the name of the 
Conservatives and Sig. Cavalloti for the extreme Left — 
regarded the economical question as first in importance. They 
wished for no new taxes and no new debts, and preferred 
to sacrifice the important rdle that Crispi proposed to play 
in foreign politics. Here, then, were two clear programs 
between which the country might decide. But, at this 
moment, Sig. di Rudini and his friends of the Old Right 
came to the front and executed a manoeuvre which afterwards 
brought them into power, but which has increased, if possible, 
the confusion of parties. Di Rudini and his friends declared 
that both aims could be attained and both programs executed ; 
that, by economies in the budget, new taxes and new debts 
could be avoided and military expenditures continued on 



688 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

a scale which would enable Italy to take a leading position 
in foreign affairs. This satisfied everybody — the court, which 
insisted on the maintenance of the Triple Alliance and the 
expenditures which such a policy necessarily entailed, and the 
taxpayers, who protested against new taxes. Crispi allowed 
himself to be overreached by the Old Right and adopted the 
same program, at least in its chief features. The plan, how- 
ever, was impracticable — a fact which its originators might 
have suspected but agreed to ignore. Here is a list of the 
expenditures of Italy during the financial year 1889-90, in 
millions of francs : 

Unavoidable expenses (interest on the permanent 

and redeemable public debt, pensions, etc.) . 700 

Military expenses 422 

All other expenses 515 

Total 1,637 



The last item of 515 millions was the only place where 
di Rudini's economies could be exercised. But even here 
there were expenses which it was impossible to reduce : 
expenses, for example, incidental to the collection of taxes ; 
expenses for the maintenance of the police, etc. It could not 
be seriously hoped to introduce here economies sufficient to 
cover the large sums of which Italy stood in need. In di 
Rudini's program this difficulty was simply evaded. As 
premier, di Rudini was forced, in spite of his program, to con- 
tract new debts, and nevertheless he failed to reestablish the 
equilibrium of the budget. Impelled by necessity, he thought 
of lessening the military expenses. It was then that he 
encountered the resistance of the court. An intrigue, cleverly 
conducted by an employee of the royal household, brought 
Sig. Giolitti into power and permitted him to dissolve the 
Chamber and control the ensuing elections. Minister Giolitti 
is maintaining the equilibrium of the budget by loans. He is 
openly borrowing thirty million francs a year for the construc- 
tion of railways. He is also borrowing indirectly, through an 



No. 4.] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 689 

operation in annuities ; and, probably, he will be obliged to 
borrow still more on other pretexts. 

There is doubtless something to be said in favor of each of 
the three methods by which the balance of the budget can be 
maintained, viz., loans, increase of taxation and diminution 
of military expenditures ; but the politicians steadily avoid 
committing themselves to any one of these different methods, 
and the country is never called upon to make a choice between 
them. 

Ministerial crises in Italy rarely lead to an entire change of 
the cabinet. It is generally a matter of reorganization ; and 
the opposition of yesterday may become a part of the ministry 
it had previously opposed. A newspaper inspired by Sig. 
Nicotera (minister of the interior in di Rudini's cabinet) 
states that when Giolitti, for a long time a partisan of di 
Rudini, attacked him, the members of di Rudini's cabinet 
agreed not to take part in any ministry which Giolitti might 
form. Two members — the minister of war and the minister 
of marine — did not keep their word, and took office under the 
new ministry. Sig. Grimaldi was one of the warmest 
supporters of di Rudini's ministry ; in fact it was understood 
that he was about to become a member of it. On the 5th of 
May he made a speech in the House which was most favorable 
to di Rudini. He said, speaking of Giolitti and his friends, 
that their change of attitude was "illogical," and that it did 
not seem right to him that those who had accompanied the 
ministry in its brightest days should abandon it when it seemed 
falling. He presented the order of the day in favor of the 
ministry, which was rejected. Consequently the ministry fell, 
and Giolitti took up the succession. But a short time elapsed 
before Grimaldi became minister of finance in the new cabinet. 

A very interesting report has been published, giving the 
votes of the deputies during the last legislative period. From 
this report it appears that twenty-five deputies who, on the 
31st of January, 1891, voted that they had confidence in 
Crispi's ministry, voted on the 21st of March in favor of a 
resolution declaring that the House had entire confidence in 



690 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

his successor, di Rudini. There were only twenty-three mem- 
bers out of five hundred and eight who were constant in voting 
against Crispi's ministry and were afterwards constant in sup- 
porting that of di Rudini. This is a small number to constitute 
a real party. But what is more remarkable is to see how even 
the members of Crispi's cabinet voted when di Rudini had 
overturned the ministry to which they belonged. To translate 
their action into English values it must be imagined that the 
members of Lord Salisbury's cabinet, directly after having 
fallen from power, should vote, all but one, in favor of a Glad- 
stonian ministry, and that their electors should think it perfectly 
natural for them to do this. 

The political condition of Italy to-day is in some degree 
analogous to its social condition in the time of the Compagnie 
di Ventura. Then the cleverest or most fortunate leader drew 
round him the strongest bands ; now the politician from whom 
the greatest advantages can be expected attracts the greatest 
number of deputies, who abandon him without scruple for any 
other leader who seems better able to serve their interests ; 
and sometimes they abandon him from mere love of change. 
Matters have been at their worst, in this regard, since the 
ministry of Depretis. Cynical and corrupt, Depretis destroyed 
the last remaining vestiges of parties ; and it was then 
that the name " Transformists " was coined to designate the 
politicians of the new era. Politically, the Italian Trans- 
formists correspond to the French Opportunists ; and it is 
worthy of note that at nearly the same time when Opportunism 
appeared in France and Transformism in Italy, the old lines 
between Whigs and Tories began to disappear or to shift 
considerably in England. It would almost seem as if the 
same causes had been operative in the three countries — with 
different degrees of intensity, indeed, and with results varying 
by reason of differences in character and institutions. 

Several leading Italian politicians have tried to modify this 
situation, but their efforts have completely miscarried. We 
must note, first of all, the attempts which have been made to 
promote the organization of parties through changes in the 



No. 4.] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 69 1 

electoral law. The law of December 17, i860, was based 
upon a property qualification. The system was modified by 
the law of September 24, 1882, which considerably augmented 
the number of electors. 1 It was hoped, by interesting a larger 
number of persons in the political life of the country, to form 
large political parties. With the same end in view the scrutin 
de liste, or election by general ticket, was introduced ; the 
kingdom being divided into electoral districts or "colleges," 
in each of which from three to five deputies were to be chosen. 
In the districts electing five deputies provision was made for 
minority representation through the system of the limited 
vote, each voter being allowed to write but four names on his 
ballot. This law was born under bad auspices. Its approval 
in the committee of the Senate was obtained by a bargain, 
as a result of which the state bought the Venetian railways. 
As far as the constitution of parties was concerned, the 
results were absolutely null. It was not unusual to see three 
candidates of nominally diverse parties unite and the electors 
would vote for this incongruous list without the least scruple. 
It was therefore resolved to return to the scrutin uninominale, 
or district ticket, which was reestablished by the electoral 
laws of March 5, 1891, and June 18, 1892. The elections 
of November 6, 1892, were governed by these later laws, 
but the results were precisely the same as at the antecedent 
elections. 

1 The first general election took place January 27, 1861. The Kingdom of 
Italy did not then include Venice or Rome. The elections of October 22, 1865, 
were completed by the elections of November 25, 1866, in the province of Venice. 
Finally the elections of November 20, 1870, included the province of Rome. The 
following table shows the total number of qualified electors under the law of 
i860, and the extent to which they participated in the elections : 

Entitled to Actually Percent 

Votb. Voting. agb. 

January 27, 1861 418,696 239,583 57-22 

October 22, 1865 504,263 271,923 53-9 2 

March 10, 1867 498,208 258,243 S r ^3 

November 20, 1870 .... 530,018 240,974 45-47 

November 8, 1874 57'>939 3 l8 >5'7 55-69 

November 5, 1876 605,007 358,158 59.22 

May 16, 1880 621,896 369,627 59-44 



692 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

It has also been proposed to give greater authority to the 
Senate by changing the manner of selecting Senators. 1 The 
Marquis Alfieri, who represents the liberal traditions of Count 
Cavour, is one of the most active promoters of this reform ; 
but for the moment it is impossible to foresee whether the 
proposal will be adopted, or what result it would produce. 

Of late years a certain number of eminent men have tried 
to draw up programs which might serve to rally and con- 
solidate parties. Sig. Cavallotti, the recognized leader of the 
extreme Left, who undoubtedly represents the highest aims 
and clearest ideas of this group, drew up such a program 
under the name of Patto di Roma (1890). It was complete 
and practical, and might well have served to solidify the Radical 
Party; and, in fact, the candidates claiming to belong to this 
party went before the country in 1890 with this program. 
But after the elections they soon ignored it, and left their 
leader alone with a few faithful adherents. 

In 1889 an excellent platform for a Liberal-Conservative 
Party was drawn up by Senator Jacini, since deceased. Jacini 
had been minister several times, and had a profound knowledge 
of the political life of the country. In 1891 he still thought 
the circumstances favorable for the establishment of such a 
party, but indicated that he had little hope of its formation. 
In a pamphlet entitled The Conservative Strength of New Italy 
(Florence, 1891), he wrote : 

All the old parties have disappeared except the extreme Left 
(which up to the present time is not united), and no new parties 
have been formed. There are some groups, some partisans, some 
ministerials at any cost, no matter who may be in the government, 
but nothing more. This is certainly a condition of things favorable 
to the formation of a party such as we have spoken of. . . . But 

1 Senators are appointed by the king and for life. They must be over forty 
years of age, and are selected from among the ecclesiastical dignitaries and those 
who have held important political positions, appointive or elective. Eligible also 
are members of the Academy, five years after nomination, men of scientific 
eminence, and persons who for three years have paid three thousand francs a 
year in direct taxes. Besides these the princes of the royal family form a part 
of the Senate. 



No. 4.] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 693 

the character of the Conservatives is anything but energetic, and 
one must not ask of them what they have not the strength to give. 
Left to themselves, although the present circumstances favor them, 
they would not succeed in constituting a militant party. The diffi- 
culty is increased by the fact that no man capable of becoming their 
head is to be found in their ranks. 

At the time of the last general elections Zanardelli, of the 
Old Left, made a speech in which he suggested a very logical 
basis for a division of parties. He thought that they should 
group themselves according to the greater or less extension 
which they were willing to give to the functions of govern- 
ment. But all such proposals have been treated as pure 
theory. Neither the politicians nor the electors have shown 
any interest in them. The politicians and their constituents 
have more direct, more practical and above all more personal 
ends in view. The electors ask the candidate what he will 
do for them ; and the deputy puts the same question to the 
ministry that solicits his support. 

Sig. Bonghi, a leading man of letters, attributes his defeat 
at the last elections, not to his hostility to the Triple Alliance, 
as the semi-official papers explain it, but to the fact that he had 
not occupied himself enough with the petty private affairs of 
his constituents. A certain Piedmontese deputy is absolutely 
the factotum of his electors. There is no little service that he 
will not perform, even to looking after the commissions of his 
constituents' wives among Roman dressmakers and milliners. 
This member holds his seat in permanence ; nobody would dare 
dispute it. Other members get elected by paying liberally; but 
their position is always less secure than that of the deputies 
who can procure for their electors the favor of the government 
and of the financial companies that depend on the government. 
As for the opinions of a representative, these are generally 
regarded by his constituents as immaterial, so long as they do 
not interfere with his keeping in the good graces of each and 
every ministry. When they do interfere with this supreme 
duty, they are felt to be detrimental. 



694 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

II. 

There is perhaps no country, except England, where an im- 
portant part of the economic interests of the citizens do not 
depend on the state ; but the proportion which this part bears to 
the whole differs in various countries ; and it is especially this 
proportion that we must keep in view when we wish to study 
the effects of the extension of governmental functions. In 
countries where protection prevails, the protected merchants, 
and those who aspire to be protected, evidently depend on 
the state. They can have only one aim — to take possession 
of the government, or to sell their support to the political 
party ready to pay for it by the utmost possible protection. 
Agricultural protection especially has the effect of depriving 
of their independence the class of great landed proprietors, 
who would otherwise be in a position to conduct themselves 
with entire freedom in political questions. 

Some states, besides protecting through customs duties, 
pursue a policy of a financial protection which puts most of 
the enterprises of the country in their power, mainly through 
the medium of chartered banks, or state banks of issue. 
Accessory protection must also be considered ; such as steam- 
ship subsidies, the monopolies accorded to private individuals, 
the privileges of the credit foncier, etc. All these forms of 
governmental interference are found united in Italy ; and if 
they do not produce greater evils than those actually existing, 
it must be ascribed to a happy moderation in the Italian 
character which prevents the government from taking as much 
advantage of its power as it might or as much as other 
governments do. On studying this question more deeply, it is 
impossible not to be struck with the absolute economic 
dependence of the citizens on the state. In England, 
manufacturers, agriculturists and merchants hope to make 
their fortunes by their own labor and not through the favors of 
the state. France, even, which is one of the countries that in 
this respect resemble Italy, has several branches of national 
production which are satisfied with asking the state not to 



No. 4] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 695 

injure them. The large wine producers, the silk manufacturers 
and dyers of Lyons, the manufacturers of articles de Paris, etc., 
expect nothing from the state except that it should not prevent 
them from selling their products abroad, by provoking 
retaliation through absurd customs duties. But in Italy the pro- 
portion of independent producers is far smaller. There are many 
silk weavers and wine producers, but that is all. The other 
producers either enjoy or seek state protection. 

In Italy, as in France, the railway companies are closely 
dependent on the state. In Italy the railways have reverted 
to the state, which has leased them to private companies. 
These leases are marked by a great defect. A fixed share — 
twenty-seven and one-half per cent 1 — of the net profits is 
taken by the state. Thus the railways are prevented from 
pursuing the method of all modern industries, /. e., to produce 
largely and to be content with small profits. The government 
is not inclined to make reductions in the tariffs possible by 
reducing its percentage of the earnings, because it instinctively 
feels that these reductions would not always be made in order 
to develop traffic, but that they would soon be dependent on 
political influence, with a great resultant loss to the govern- 
ment revenues. But what is more serious from our present 
point of view is, that the railway companies derive very little 
profit from the working of the old lines. Their principal 
earnings come from the new lines which their contracts with 
the government have allowed them to construct. This puts 
them in strict dependence on the government, which they are 
obliged to propitiate in order to be able to make contracts that 
will be advantageous in the future. 

The Bank of France is closely connected with the govern- 
ment, but it is never seen using its influence to aid enterprises 
protected by the government. Of the corresponding institu- 
tions in Italy the same cannot be said. For example, in the 
monthly balance sheet of the banks of issue published by the 

1 This is the proportion paid by the chief lines. There is besides a set of lines 
called secondary, where the companies receive only half of the gross profit, but 
receive besides a fixed subsidy of 3,000 francs per kilometre. 



696 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

government there may be read a note explaining the surplus 
circulation of the Banca Nazionale. The balance sheet of March 
31st contains the following: "Assets, 64,793,125 francs: repre- 
sented by 1 1,043,125 in notes of the Bank of Rome; 3,750,000 
subsidy to the province of Cagliari ; 50,000,000 extraordinary 
issue to the banks of Turin." Each of these items calls for 
some words of explanation. Why did the Banca Nazionale keep 
in its coffers the notes of the Bank of Rome, instead of paying 
them out as change ? As has now been abundantly proved, the 
government knew from the report of the inspectors, presented 
in 1889 by Senator Alvisi, that the Bank of Rome had a secret 
circulation of twenty-five millions. It was to aid in preventing 
the discovery of this fact that the Banca Nazionale was 
required to retain the notes of the Bank of Rome. As for the 
subsidy to the province of Cagliari, that was given when the 
savings bank of this province, whose director was a member of 
the majority, became bankrupt. The director was tried and 
convicted by the court of assizes of Genoa. In the course 
of his trial he said : " I am convicted simply because fortune 
has not favored me. Many other banks do what mine has 
done, only success up to the present saves them." Recent 
revelations with regard to the Bank of Rome show that these 
words were prophetic. The subsidy to the banks of Turin 
was given chiefly to the Tiberina Bank to prevent it from 
failing. It was on this occasion that the government permitted 
the banks to refuse redemption of their notes, and this was 
the origin of the present financial crisis in Italy. 

These are facts which cannot be denied. It may be objected 
that up to the present time proofs are wanting that the banks 
of issue provided the government with funds for election 
expenses. It is certain that the government spends for the 
elections much more than its secret service fund can place at 
its disposal, but this does not prove that the banks provide the 
rest. Other enterprises dependent on the government may also 
render assistance. Companies which receive, or hope to receive, 
subsidies, privileges, monopolies, make good use of their funds 
in sustaining a government which promises them favors. There 



No. 4] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 697 

are reports that in the last elections the gratitude of certain 
persons who were made Senators was manifested in offers of 
funds to the government for election purposes. But here, too, 
proofs are wanting. It is probably from fear of eliciting too 
much information on the means employed by the government 
and its allies in obtaining money that the proposed parliamen- 
tary inquiry into the Bank of Rome has been stifled. 

Many enterprises are supported only by continual renewals 
of their bills, discounted by the banks of issue ; and naturally 
the discount is most freely granted to those which enjoy the 
favor of the government. It should be noted that the legal 
tender quality of the bank notes is granted only for a very 
short time, generally six months or a year. This has kept the 
banks in strict dependence on the government and the legis- 
lative power. To secure their good will the banks have been 
obliged to have what is called a political portfolio. This name 
is given to bills discounted to legislators or influential journal- 
ists, which are renewed indefinitely. 

As to the sort of protection which I have called accessory, 
one example will suffice. On the 2 1 st of last February Deputy 
Colajanni, speaking upon the subsidies to be granted to the 
General Navigation Company, said : 

The honorable Sig. Bettolo has enumerated the causes why the 
dividend of the General Navigation Company amounted to only five 
per cent, while other private companies paid twice and even three 
times as much. He said that the General Navigation Company 
spent more for coal, and also that their general expenditure was 
greater. . . . While other companies pay twenty francs a ton for 
their coal, the General Navigation pays thirty francs. . . . Why 
does the General Navigation spend so much in coal, when it might 
spend some millions less ? It seems that the contractors and 
brokers of the company are most fortunate people. 

Sig. Colajanni then proceeded to point out similar abuses in 
the repairs of the steamers belonging to the company. 

These details illustrate the very wide diffusion of gains 
resulting from the protection granted by the state. Those who 
nominally enjoy the profit are obliged to share it with a great 



698 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

number of auxiliaries. An immense governmental patronage 
has been developed, like that which existed in the later period 
of the Roman Republic. Every enterprise enjoying govern- 
mental protection has a great number of hangers-on. These 
share the gains, and it is their duty to defend with all their 
might the privileges from which the gains are derived. As 
in ancient Rome, therefore, the political elections are largely 
controlled by those who are indirectly interested in government 
contracts. 

If now we leave the economic field and consider the other 
fields of social activity, we still find the influence of the state 
preponderant. One domain alone is free from it — that of 
religion. The dissensions between the papacy and the monarchy 
have luckily put the clergy beyond the influence of the govern- 
ment. This is the real reason why the Italian politicians are 
so hostile to the papacy. Foreigners who attribute this hostilty 
to anti-religious feeling make a great mistake. It cannot be 
denied that such a sentiment exists among some adversaries of 
the papacy, but the great majority of the politicians have 
no strong feeling either for or against religion. They simply 
feel regret at not having the influence of the clergy on their 
side to consolidate their authority. Many very honorable men 
have a similar feeling, which seems to them purely patriotic ; 
they wish to see the papacy use its influence in behalf of the 
Italian fatherland ; 1 but they do not generally distinguish the 

1 On this subject there has appeared a very singular pamphlet by G. Toscanelli, 
entitled : Religion and Country attacked by the Pope. Should Italy Defend Her- 
self ? (Florence, 1890.) Signor Toscanelli, a member of Parliament, was a good 
Catholic. He was deputed by Signor Depretis to negotiate an arrangement 
with the pope. Depretis, a great purchaser of consciences, wished to have 
those of the Catholic priests in his service. (Sig. Crispi also, according to what 
Toscanelli tells us, was in treaty for an arrangement with the pope.) The pope, 
however, was not to be persuaded. The spirit in which Sig. Toscanelli writes is 
indicated by the following passages : "The present contemporary politics of the 
pope ought to be taught, analyzed and censured in the upper schools " (p. 104). 
" In order to wrestle with the policy of the pope, the state has three methods. 
One consists in not granting him the temporal power. This means is not at all 
efficacious. . . . Another is that of refusing to recognize any pope who is not 
proposed by the government, and punishing him if he exercises any acts of 
jurisdiction" (p. no). 



No. 4.] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 699 

welfare of their country from the welfare of their own par- 
ticular party. The laws which their Parliament makes give 
them full control of every one's body, and by means of the 
clergy they would like to reach the soul also. Many desire a 
concordat like that concluded by Napoleon I. 

In default of the church there remain the schools. In 
America and England university professors are absolutely 
independent. In France they are beginning to be dependent 
upon the government ; but a certain number of savants escape 
its control, thanks to a reputation which enables them to do 
without its favors. In Italy these exceptions are extremely 
rare : nearly all the higher instructors are completely dependent 
on the government. Even in the educational institutions which 
are supported by the provinces the teaching staff is not free 
from governmental interference. At Bari, for example, there 
is a higher commercial school which is a local institution. Its 
director, until recently, was Sig. Pantaleoni, a very distinguished 
economist, whose writings are as well-known abroad as in Italy. 
Sig. Pantaleoni had published a scientific study on the draw- 
backs on alcohol, in which he pointed out the inconveniences 
which the interference of the deputies had caused in this 
matter. This study, which appeared in the Giornale degli 
Economist^ passed unnoticed ; but being quoted by a foreign 
magazine, 1 it aroused the attention and the resentment of the 
government. The president of the council of the school at 
Bari wrote to Sig. Pantaleoni complaining that he had set the 
government against them, "while he knew the school had need 
of its help." Sig. Pantaleoni was subjected to an inquiry, and 
a vote of censure was passed on him. To this he naturally 
refused to submit, and consequently lost his place. Sig. Bonghi 
has been subjected to a similar inquiry on account of two 
newspaper articles. Bonghi, it is true, is no longer a professor; 
he is a councilor of state ; and this, though it cannot justify, 
may at least serve as a more plausible pretext for the pro- 
ceedings against him. Let me hasten to add that such cases 

1 In an article by the present writer, in the Revue des Deux Mondes, October 1 5, 
1891. 



700 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

are rare. The government generally has no need to punish 
an independence which is quite exceptional ; it only takes care 
to proportion its rewards to the zeal shown in serving it. 

The influence of the government extends also to the courts 
of justice. In Italy, as in England and France, there are no 
absolutely independent courts, such as are found in the United 
States. But even where the courts are legally dependent upon 
the government (as in England, where they are the creatures 
of Parliament), complete judicial independence may in fact 
exist. In examining the condition of the Italian judiciary, we 
must rigidly reject all testimony which appears to be dictated 
by personal or party hostility. But unfavorable evidence 
proceeding from persons friendly to the existing regime, and 
above all, from the judges themselves, seems conclusive. An 
official journal has recently treated the question with unusual 
frankness. It begins by observing that for some time past 
public opinion has regarded the judiciary as less impartial than 
it ought to be, and it adds : 

The fault is to some extent general. It is in the parliamentary 
system, the deputies, the government, the press; in short, it lies 
with all those who have mined out of the rock of justice a vein of 
personal benefit. Once upon a time the judges were obliged to 
bow to one strong tyrant only; now they are subjected to the will 
of thousands, and in their own interest they must submit to the 
influence of great and small. Look at the struggle among the 
judges, from the praetorships 1 of the small provinces up to the 
ordinary tribunals and the courts of appeal. Study the psychology 
of their most legitimate ambitions ; rebuild the history of their 
dreams, encouraged by the smiles of the syndics, protected by the 
prefects for the sake of their electoral influence, or lighted by 
the benevolent smiles of the legal deputies, from whose small golden 
medals at audiences shine promises of recommendation for promotion 
and change of place. Let us turn even to the highest step of the 
ladder and read the inmost thoughts of the magistrate who, either 
by tact or by open complaisance and obedience to the government, 
becomes a political leader instead of a chief dispenser of justice. 
They begin with compromise and finish by surrendering. The best, 

1 [The Italian pretor corresponds closely to the French juge de paix. — Eds.] 



No. 4-] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 70I 

seeing that the most pliable are so often preferred to them, get 
disgusted and leave the profession. Thus the intellectual level of 
the judiciary tends to decline. 

In Italy the government cannot remove a judge from office 
or degrade him, but it may assign him to another tribunal of 
equal or higher rank. The government rewards its friends by 
promotion and punishes its enemies by transferring them from 
courts situated in the principal towns to smaller and less 
desirable places. In France the judicial tenure is legally 
secure, both as to grade and as to residence. It has recently 
been proposed to change the rule as to residence and empower 
the government to transfer the judges. It was frankly 
admitted by the Opportunist press that this proposal was made 
with a view of increasing the influence of the government over 
the judiciary. In Italy a minister of the Right, Sig. Vigliani, 
tried to take the judiciary out of politics by protecting it 
against the government. He caused a royal decree to be 
issued, October 3, 1873, establishing rules for the transfer of 
judges to new residences. But in less than five years (January 
3, 1 878) another decree was issued at the instance of a minister 
of the Left, abolishing these rules ; and since then the judges 
have been subject, in this matter, to the absolute power of the 
ministry. Attorney General La Francesca observes on this 
subject : 

The removal of a magistrate from one place to another injures 
him financially ; destroys his ties of friendship, his habits and his 
dignity ; disturbs and troubles the security of his mind, and 
undermines his liberty. The practical result of such things indicates 
why they are done. We have seen justice grow torpid under the 
influence of removals. 1 

These words are especially significant because of the official 
position held by the writer. Still more significant is an 
utterance of Sig. Eula, who holds one of the highest positions 
in the judiciary of the kingdom — that of president of the 
court of appeals at Turin. Sig. Eula said publicly to Sig. 

1 Del Pubblico Ministero nell' Ordine Giustiziario (Naples, 1880). 



702 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

Zanardelli that he commended him for not having asked the 
judges to render him, while on the road to the ministry, those 
services that his predecessors had required. 

Sig. Minghetti, whose optimistic view of Italian politics has 
already been referred to, laid great stress on the growing 
dependence of the judiciary. He wrote : 

It would be difficult to furnish proofs of the interference of the 
deputies in the nomination of judges, but it is one of those notorious 
things of which the public conscience is a witness. Some facts, 
however, we can cite, which show that this thing is not regarded as 
forbidden or irregular. A deputy, with real but unusual candor, 
defended himself against the troublesome attacks of a newspaper 
that accused him of begging the ministry to exile the judges of his 
province from the tribunal, by answering : " How could they make 
such an unaccountable charge ? To contradict it, it is enough to say 
that the tribunal is such as it is thanks to me. Many of the judges 
who compose it were especially suggested by me to the ministry." x 

Sig. Minghetti also quotes an appeal sent to the ministry of 
justice, bearing the signatures of several deputies, asking him 
to select a proteg£ of theirs for the place of attorney general. 
He adds : 

In the investigation of crimes and the search for their authors, 
judges have often paused and drawn back when they found before 
them powerful criminals and accomplices. The first to be corrupted 
by the local influence has been the government ; not for money, it is 
true, but for votes. . . . Hence, old and worthy men express the 
fear, and some venture the assertion, that under the Italian 
governments from 1815 to i860 justice was better administered and 
the judges as a class were more respectable than is the case to-day. 
I do not agree with this opinion. However, if one wishes to be 
impartial he must acknowledge that, where there was no question of 
politics, the courts of that period generally sentenced with sufficient 
authority. 

A politician on the other side of the House, Sig. Boccarini, 
who was one of the leaders of the Left, in a speech delivered 
May 16, 1886, alluded to "the discredit into which the courts 

1 Minghetti, Political Parties and their Interference with Justice and Adminis- 
tration (1881). 



No. 4-] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 703 

have fallen." On the 26th of May, Sig. Cavallotti cited a letter 
in which Sig. Baggiarini, Attorney General in the Court of 
Appeals, tendered his resignation, and in which he stated as 
his reason for resigning that he was not willing to render the 
government services which were against his conscience. 1 

The trial of Strigelli at Turin in 1884 was a case in which 
serious pressure was shown to have been exercised by the 
government. Strigelli, who was accused of having forged 
bank-notes, was under the protection of the prefect of Turin ; 
and this prefect, who was an excellent electoral agent of 
Depretis' ministry, obtained from the government almost 
anything that he wished. Sig. Noce, who had been attorney 
general of the court of appeals at Turin, gave evidence in court 
that his substitute, Sig. Torti, had been persecuted by the 
government because he had had the courage to prosecute agents 
of the police. A letter written by the prefect was produced in 
court, the purpose of which was to prevent the case against 
Strigelli from being pushed through. 2 Strigelli was sentenced 
to penal servitude. 

I might cite other cases, but these seem sufficient. I will 
only add the evidence of a judge of high position, Sig. Carlo 
Lozzi, President of the Court of Appeals. In a pamphlet 

1 Here is part of the letter : " I hoped to die in this career to which I was 
bound by ties of love, habit and study. I was obliged to abandon it when I was 
expected to give what the dignity of my robe and the conscience of a magistrate 
forbade my giving." 

2 The letter of the prefect (Casalis), which was read in court on the 25th of 
January, contained the following sentence : " It is useless for me to point out 
how seriously I desire that Strigelli should not have the smallest annoyance." 
Sig. Noce deposed : " The officials charged with the prosecution insisted that we 
should proceed, it not being possible to construct a case without implicating 
Strigelli. Then I went to Rome and explained the situation to the keeper of the 
seals. I said that the prefect, although he had no guarantees in his favor, had 
a great interest in that man." This time Sig. Noce accomplished nothing. But 
he adds : " I returned a second time to Rome, and Sig. Zanardelli . . . told me 
to go ahead." We must bear in mind that the question was one of forgery, and 
that the prefect knew the judicial antecedents of the accused man, which were 
absolutely deplorable. Strigelli, taking advantage of the protection of the prefect, 
was afterwards an accomplice in the robbery of a goldsmith named Lacarini, and 
had some innocent people condemned as guilty. When all was discovered, the 
police offered 2,500 francs to Lacarini if he would withdraw the accusation. 



704 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

which was published at Bologna in 1883, 1 he observes that 
judges are not as independent as they ought to be, and alludes 
to the undue influence exercised by deputies who are members 
of the bar. 2 He speaks of 

scandalous promotions, which are attributed by public opinion to 
political protectors ; and removals which are said to have been 
obtained by legal deputies because they would have lost or feared 
to lose a case by the decision of a particular judge, so that it was 
needful to send him away at any cost. Let the first president, 
Senator Paoli, tell what happened among the persons employed in 
the court of appeals in Florence, without his knowledge, and one 
may almost say, in spite of him. 

The men who govern the country have almost unlimited 
power to protect and enrich their friends and to ruin their 
enemies 3 — parcere subjectis et debellare superbos — but they do 
not often take full advantage of their authority. Apart from 
some exceptional cases (as when the Left came into power in 
1876), the men who alternately hold and lose authority respect 
each others' friends and partisans. This is a consequence of 
that moderation which is a distinct feature in the Italian 
character. It is also a policy dictated by intelligent self- 
interest. The minister of to-day spares the partisans of his 
predecessor that his own partisans may afterwards be spared by 

1 Carlo Lozzi, the Magistracy before the new Parliament. Observations a 
propos. 

a In the Corriere di Napoli of March 13, 1893, the following correspondence 
from Palermo appeared : " To-day a civil suit was to be argued before the court 
of appeals, in which Crispi was defending one of the parties . . . Some 
of Crispi's friends made a demonstration in his favor — a demonstration so 
energetic that the lawyer for the opposite side had to suspend his address because 
of the cry: 'Let Crispi speak.' The president of the court of justice had not the 
courage to clear the hall ; he bowed to Crispi's power and the suit was brought 
to a conclusion without further argument I " 

3 When it is desirable to get rid of common people who displease the authori- 
ties, they are usually condemned for resistance to the officers of the police. It is 
easy for the latter to provoke this crime, and in case of necessity they falsify facts. 
It is particularly of late years that this device has been employed. The number 
of offences of this sort reported to the courts in 1880 was no; 1881, 7,904; 
1882,8,033; 1883,8,763; 1884,9,560; 1885,661; 1886, 10,152; 1887, 10,669; 
1888, 10,669; l88 9> io.2°4i 1890, ii,437- 



No. 4.] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 705 

his successor. But any attempt at organized opposition, not 
against this or that particular ministry but against the present 
system of government, would be promptly and unsparingly 
crushed. To wish for a part of the favors dispensed by the 
state is deemed a legitimate ambition, which may be combated 
but cannot reasonably be punished ; but to wish to arrest the 
flow of its favors altogether, is considered an act of rebellion 
which deserves chastisement. In this matter even indifference 
is culpable. There is no place in Italy for a citizen who, to 
preserve his independence, refuses to be a party to political 
patronage. He finds himself in about the same position as a 
Hindoo who has no caste. He is an outlaw, a man whom 
everyone can attack. If a lawyer, he has no clients ; if an 
engineer, nobody employs him ; if a merchant or tradesman, 
he is ruined ; if a land owner he is exposed to petty annoyances 
from prefects and syndics. Every door is closed to him, 
everyone repulses him, until the day comes when the govern- 
ment does him the honor to think him dangerous, and then it 
finds some way to have him condemned by a court of justice 
for an imaginary crime. 

The government justifies all this by saying that these 
people are generally factious. There is some truth in the 
statement. In countries where legal resistance is impossible, 
popular discontent tends to faction and ends in sedition. 
Of all the numerous changes of ministry in Italy, none has 
been due to a spontaneous expression of public opinion. A 
movement like that of the Cobden Club in England for free 
trade, or like that which forced the Reform Bill through 
Parliament, is absolutely impossible in Italy. The government 
has at its call friends powerful enough to crush any movement 
of this sort as soon as it seems to acquire any importance. 
There was never a more unpopular tax in Italy than the grist 
tax (macinato). The popular discontent aroused by this tax 
offered a unique occasion for a great political league, such as 
are formed in the United States and in England. Such a 
movement was at first attempted ; but the government dissolved 
the society that had originated it and the movement was at 



jo6 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

once arrested. Some years after, when the people had grown 
accustomed to the tax and had ceased to protest, the govern- 
ment spontaneously abolished it. The people, never having 
seen such movements come to anything, look upon them as 
absolutely vain and fruitless, and are not disposed to occupy 
themselves about them. Men who, when their hardships have 
become absolutely insupportable, permit themselves to be 
implicated in movements of a seditious character, will refuse 
to join a society that aims at the legal abolition of their 
grievances. They are sure that such a course would expose 
them uselessly to the vengeance of those who hold the reins of 
power and of their political dependents. 

In the eyes not only of the people but of a great part of 
the bourgeoisie, politics are a luxury which only the man who 
has a following, who has clients in the old Latin sense of the 
term, can permit himself. A father may often be heard to 
praise his son by saying : " He has no vices, does not keep 
evil company, and does not occupy himself with politics." 
This feeling explains a singular phenomenon, observable from 
time to time — the unanimous abstention of all the electors in 
a particular locality by way of protest against the government. 
A law passed not long ago removed the justices of the peace 
{pretor) in a number of small places. The electors of some of 
these places now abstain from voting at all elections. Consid- 
ering that their rights have been ignored, they revenge them- 
selves by sulking at their masters, not by attempting to 
select new ones. I once reproached a workman, who was a 
very honest man, for having taken ten francs to vote in favor 
of a deputy. I represented to him that if he joined with 
his companions they could elect some one who would under- 
take to get the heavy taxes lessened. He answered : "All 
that is useless ; the heads will always do what they desire. 
The only good we can get is some bank notes at election 
time." 

Election expenses, however, are not very large. As far 
as can be judged from rather incomplete information, thirty 
thousand francs seems to be the average for candidates who 



No. 4.] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 707 

have local support as well as that of the government. If this 
support is wanting, the expense is naturally much greater. 
The example given formerly by England shows that purchases 
of elections are not incompatible with the good working of the 
parliamentary regime. The deputy who has bought his seat 
is sometimes fairly independent of the government and of 
electoral coteries. A person worthy of credence told me 
an anecdote that illustrates this point. Some friends were 
endeavoring to make a deputy change his opinions. They told 
him that his electors would not be content if he did not follow 
the government in all its evolutions. The deputy argued with 
them for a time, and then, losing patience, said : " Let them 
leave me in peace. I have paid them and we are quits, and 
I mean to vote according to my conscience." But such cases 
as this are exceptional. Generally the candidates regard this 
outlay as an investment, 1 and they wish to see their capital 
returned with a good profit. 

Laws, of course, exist against electoral corruption, but they 
are never put in force. A justice of the peace and a public 
prosecutor in Venice, who were foolish enough to take the 
provisions of these laws seriously, were removed by di Rudini's 
ministry, and the suit was dropped. On this occasion the 
newspapers openly said that it was ridiculous to attempt to 
punish the buying of votes, which had become a general and 
ordinary custom. 

The support of the government, however, is more effective 

1 77 Corriere di Napoli asserts that the last elections have brought quantities of 
the notes of the Bank of Rome into circulation in Tuscany, where before they 
were hardly known. I cannot vouch for the truth of this statement. But another 
assertion has been made which is supported by strong circumstantial evidence. 
It is said that during the last elections several candidates gave their electors 
halves of bank-notes for five or ten francs, promising to furnish the other halves 
if they were elected. It is certain that shortly after the elections the quantity of 
bank-notes in circulation, composed of odd halves stuck together, was so great 
that the financial agents of the government were obliged to apply to the Treasury 
for a ruling on the matter. It seems that the electors whose candidates were not 
successful, were obliged to stick together the odd halves which they had received ; 
and it seems that even those whose candidates were elected, and who received the 
second half of the notes of which they already held the first half, made frequent 
mistakes in matching their half notes. 



708 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

than money ; and the most effective form of governmental 
interference is, of course, the appointing and removing of 
officials. On the 2nd of July, 1886, Sig. Nicotera, who has 
twice been minister of the interior, said in the Chamber that 
he was ready to furnish a long list of government clerks in 
the province of Avellino who had been recalled or had lost 
their employments for electoral reasons, and he added in 
characteristic words : " Certain things may be done, but they 
must be done well. The ministry has done them, and done 
them badly." 

Sig. Cavallotti, speaking in the Chamber on the 30th of 
June, 1886, said: 

In the college of Pesaro at Cagli (of this I have documentary 
evidence) the communal messenger distributed, together with the 
electoral poll tickets, the governmental list of candidates, and added 
a franc for each name. ... At Arezzo rates were a little higher. 
The general tariff for ministerial votes, as is shown by trustworthy 
testimony, was a franc fifty centimes. 

Depretis (Minister of the Interior) interjected: "No, it was 
a franc at Arezzo too." Cavallotti answered: 

Excuse me, that is an error ; exactly a franc fifty was the average 
price ; I have written testimony of this deposited at a notary's office. 
At Modena, six francs ; at Alatri, a college in the Roman district, 
eight, ten and even one hundred francs. . . . The asylum of 
Tutra [an asylum for the poor] receives a subsidy of 400 francs 
through the kindness of the candidate N. . . . In the third election 
district of Novara a paper was distributed on which was written : 
"If you vote for these four candidates, there will be 10,000 francs 
for the asylum." In the third election district at Milan a printed 
paper was distributed which read : " Choice is easy. . . . We have 
four tried men of honor, who have procured for us the railway 
stations, the telegraph and post-offices, and who a few days ago 
obtained for us the following subsidies: 500 francs for the Infant 
Asylum, 500 for the School of Design, 1500 for the Charity 
Assembly" ... At Foligno the ministerial candidate obtained for 
the corporation a loan of 450,000 francs from the government. . . . 
In the second Roman election district a certain Ferri, originally 
from Vallinfreda, where he exercised considerable influence, had 



No. 4-] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 709 

been condemned (for wounding the syndic) to eighteen months' 
imprisonment. He was suffering the punishment of his crime when 
it was found that his presence in the electoral struggle would be 
useful. Application was made to the ministerial candidate, and 
three or four days before the elections he was pardoned, and returned 
to the electoral community just in time to pay his debt of gratitude. 

Sig. Cavallotti's party is the Left. Sig. di Rudini, who 
belongs to the Right and who has recently been president of 
the council, said on the 16th of May, 1886 : 

It is necessary to check the degeneration of the parliamentary 
system. The public administration, the assemblies, the schools, 
seem to have become parts of a great machine for getting votes. 1 

It is said that the evil is increasing. This is true if we go 
back to the earlier days of the parliamentary regime in Italy 
and compare the condition obtaining then with the condition 
obtaining now; but things seem to be scarcely worse at present 
than under the Depretis ministry. 

It is evident enough that the various facts that we have ex- 
amined stand in close connection, each with the rest ; but it is 
not easy to say whether the political disorganization of Italy is 

1 Sig. Minghetti, speaking of the degeneration of the parliamentary regime 
in Italy, said : " When a deputy no longer represents principles, is no longer 
moved by national sentiments ; when he is the patron, the solicitor, the 
agent of those who send him, there exists every sign of corruption . . . On the 
other hand, a ministry that is not able to bring together a majority representing 
some idea, is obliged to fill its place by securing the support of single deputies, 
who receive from it honors, favors and power." (Op. cit. p. 8.) 

Sig. Giolitti, who is now president of the council, made certain remarks in a 
speech delivered February 24, 1886, which he appears since to have entirely 
forgotten : " And we go on creating university professors who have no pupils to 
hear them, employments where there is no real work to be done, and all this in 
order to find places for persons who belong in society to the large class of the 
idle and needy. Henceforward I think we shall be able to apply to our budget 
the definition that Bastiat proposed for the state, namely, a great fiction in which 
every one tries to live at the expense of others." 

Senator Jacini observes that for many politicians our parliamentary regime 
"with all its rottenness, indeed because of its flaws, constitutes a real canonry, in 
which without intellectual effort or culture, but with a little rhetoric and a few 
conventional phrases, a little intrigue and a few dependents amongst journalists, 
any one can succeed in having great influence." — Pensieri sulla Politica Italiana 
(Florence, 1889), p. 40. 



7IO POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

the cause or the result of the existing corruption. Strongly 
organized political parties would exercise a certain control over 
the coteries that are formed to divide the spoils wrung from the 
taxpayers; but it is precisely these coteries that impede the 
formation of real parties. Neither religious feeling nor aristo- 
cratic pride, two of the strongest sentiments which influence 
human action, have been able to prevent Italians of the highest 
class from asking for places, enrolling themselves among those 
dependent on the government and taking service under politi- 
cians whom they thoroughly despise. The absence of political 
parties favors the extension of the functions of government, 
because to obtain a majority the ministers are obliged to 
substitute motives of personal interest for motives of political 
interest or passions which do not exist. But the extension of 
governmental functions is, in its turn, a serious obstacle to the 
formation of parties. As a royalist French paper, now allied 
to the republic, has said : " The people must end by under- 
standing that it is not by resisting the government that they 
will obtain its favors." 

I am inclined to think that the want of political parties and 
the extension of governmental activity are the consequences of 
more general causes. Some of these causes are peculiar to the 
countries of the Latin race, and some to Italy; 1 others are in 
operation in almost all civilized states. To disentangle these 
causes and discover the modes in which they act would be a very 
interesting task, but it is one that cannot be attempted in this 
essay. 

III. 

For several years Italy's foreign policy has been uniform; 
it has adhered to the alliance with Germany and Austria. The 
prime reason of this is the court's fear that the republican 
form of government may pass from France into Italy, and its 
belief that the alliance with the German Empire is favorable 

1 Sig. Turiello, of Naples, has published a very remarkable study on the 
peculiarities of the Italian character and their influence on the political life of the 
country. It would be well, however, to give more consideration than he does to 
the economic side of the question. 



No. 4.] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 71 1 

to the permanence of the dynasty in Italy. To become a 
minister you must accept the Triple Alliance. This is the 
reason that the Radicals who now aspire to power have been 
obliged to retract, to sing the praises of the Triple Alliance 
and declare themselves its partisans. 

But it is not only the sympathy of the court that maintains 
the German alliance; it is also the feeling of a part of the Italian 
bourgeoisie and the interest of the political coteries. The 
greatest obstacle to the establishment of the protective system 
in Italy was the treaty of commerce with France. All who 
expected any advantage from higher duties were impelled to 
favor an economic rupture with France ; and with this aim they 
turned to Germany. Again, the great contractors for the 
ministries of war and marine, among others the powerful steel- 
works company of Terni, found it to their interest to spread 
through the country the fear of war with France, in order 
that the military and naval expenditures might be increased. 

But in addition to those who expected a direct profit from the 
breach with France, the minds of a part of the bourgeoisie 
were haunted by sentiments which Senator Jacini has admirably 
described as "megalomania." The Italian revolution was 
rather the work of the bourgeoisie than of the people. Many 
of those who had helped to establish the new regime profited 
by it and became much richer. They became rich enough to 
think they could afford themselves luxuries; and, unhappily, 
the taste of the Italian middle class turned to one of the most 
expensive luxuries — that of glory and military conquests. 1 It 

1 Sig. de Molinari has put the facts excellently. Speaking of the Italian 
bourgeoisie, he says : " The Italian middle class is more numerous and 
necessitous than the class formerly predominant, and it needed a larger opening 
to satisfy its craving for dominion and enjoyment — a craving which had been 
sharpened by a long fast. Like all parvenus, its members wished besides to make 
an ostentatious display of their recently acquired power and fortune. . . . They 
threw themselves into a path of ostentatious and expensive policy, which 
flattered their vanity and at the same time widened their opportunities. The 
army and navy were not put on a footing suitable to a great power without 
offering to the offspring of the governing class additional aristocratic employ- 
ments, which raised them to the level of the sons of the aristocracy and, at the 
same time, gave them secure incomes." — G. de Molinari, Les Lois Naturelles de 
l'Economie Politique (Paris, 1887), p. 169. 



712 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

was partly to satisfy this desire that Depretis sent troops to 
Massowah. But this toy was not sufficient for the Italian middle 
class, who dreamt of great military enterprises. The govern- 
ments that succeeded each other in France erred in not taking 
this sentiment into account ; and they gave particular offense 
by the Tunis expedition. France might perfectly well have 
taken possession of Tunis without quarreling with Italy, 
provided it had considered and sought to conciliate the amour 
propre of the governing class of Italians. But, on the 
contrary, the French government seemed bent on humiliating 
the Italians. The German government did not commit this 
error. Prince Bismarck was too profound a connoisseur of 
human passions not to see how he could turn to account, in 
the interest of his country, the sentiment of the Italian 
governing class. By gratifying its vanity, a thing that cost 
him nothing, he bought the alliance of Italy and incited this 
country to an expenditure quite out of proportion to its 
straightened means. 

This expenditure has been defended as necessary to 
maintain the independence of the country. Such is the official 
theory, and many persons believe it to be true. But in reality 
the independence of Italy is not threatened by France ; and if 
by any chance the latter country should conceive the idea of 
conquering Italy, the other European powers would certainly 
intervene, whether formal alliances demanded such action or 
not. This even the most determined partisans of the Triple 
Alliance are often obliged to confess. 1 

1 Sig. Chiala, writing of Crispi's visit to Berlin in 1876 to offer the Italian 
alliance, says : " Who, until then, had ever doubted that Germany would have 
considered it to her interest to help Italy if she were attacked by France, even 
without a treaty ? Had not the German chancellor declared this without circum- 
locution to Count von Arnim in his letter of January 18, 1874, which had been 
made public ? " — Chiala, Pagine di Storia Contemporanea, pp. 279, 280. 

Senator Jacini, who is far from feeling the same enthusiasm for the Triple 
Alliance as Sig. Chiala, observes : " Germany was the one of the allies that had 
the strongest , reason to be satisfied. Let us allow that there is precise equality 
among the three allies as to the obligation of mutual defence. But, coming to 
concrete facts, are all three on an equal footing in respect to their territorial 
claims ? Certainly not. Who will dispute the integrity of the Italian territory 
if we do not quarrel with our neighbors ? Austria is in a less perfect position, 



No. 4.] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 713 

In 1875 Italy spent only 216 millions a year for her army 
and navy. These expenses went on increasing until, in 
1888-89, they reached 554 millions. Since then they have 
decreased to 359 millions (1891-92). But this diminution 
has been obtained by expedients which cannot be persistently 
employed. Soldiers under arms have been discharged before 
their time has expired, and companies have been reduced to an 
absurdly insufficient effective force. The provisions of the 
military magazines, including even those on the frontiers, have 
been used up. 1 Military authorities say, with reason, that if 
Italy wishes to pursue a policy which may involve a war with 
France, its armament must be equal to this contingency, and 
to obtain this result much more must be spent than at present. 
But how the nation will meet increased expenditures is a 
problem still unsolved. Up to the present time the govern- 
ment has attempted to balance the budget by increasing the 
taxes and continually making new debts. But can such a 
course be pursued indefinitely ? The possibilities of taxation, 
both as to objects and rates, seem nearly exhausted. There are 
many indications that an augmentation of imposts would not 
produce a sensible increase of revenue. 2 As to the public 
debt, the examples of Greece, Portugal, Spain and the 

because of the different races that live within her confines. But Germany has in 
view, not a vague contingency, but the certainty of a struggle to defend the con- 
quest it has made of Alsace and Lorraine." — Jacini, Pensieri sulla Politica 
Italiana, pp. 107, 108. 

1 It is characteristic of the Italian political regime that it tends always to 
sacrifice reality to appearances. The government wishes to have an army which 
is strong, at least on paper. It therefore keeps up the framework while it reduces 
the effective force to a limit that compromises the instruction and solidity of the 
army. 

2 Sig. Mazzola has shown, in the Giornale degli Economisti, that of late years 
the consumption of wheat has diminished in Italy. In the Journal des 
Economises, March, 1892, I have given an estimate which indicates that the 
consumption of wool, which in 1886 was 68 kilos for every 100 inhabitants, was 
reduced in 1889-90 to 60 kilos. 

The following table shows the quantity of coffee imported into Italy in quintals 

(100 kilos) : 

1887. 1888. 1889. 1890. 1891. 

142,650 140,267 135.484 139.824 138,166 

The reduction in consumption is evident ; and diminishing consumption 
generally indicates an impoverishment of the country. 



714 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

Argentine Republic show that Italy is still far from the limit 
at which a country no longer finds loans ; but she is very near 
the point where a future financial catastrophe is inevitable. 
After the abolition of the forced currency in 1880 and the 
loan of 644 millions of francs which was contracted for this 
purpose, the great book of the national debt was closed. But 
this only means that Italy has no longer borrowed under the 
form of five per cent consols. It has continued to borrow 
more than ever in other ways. Civil and military pensions 
have once already served to conceal a loan (by the sale of 
annuities) ; and now it is planned to make them serve the same 
purpose a second time ; and there seems to be no reason why 
these methods should not be continued indefinitely. These 
crooked courses are among the consequences of the parlia- 
mentary regime in its Italian form. Chamber and ministers 
are not far-sighted. They are contented to live from day to 
day without thinking of the future. The policy of di Rudini's 
cabinet, which was rather more open than that of its prede- 
cessors, brought the country to a point where it was necessary 
either to submit to new taxes or to reduce the army expenses. 
Di Rudini and his friends, as we have seen, tried to avoid the 
difficulty by proposing economy in all expenses except those 
of the army ; but this policy proved impracticable. At the 
present moment the government is struggling with the same 
difficulty, and Sig. Giolitti is trying to escape from the 
dilemma by contracting new debts. It is probable that this 
policy of expedients will be continued as long as possible, 
since everybody seems satisfied with it. 

A few tables will best show the financial conditions in recent 
years. All numbers represent millions of francs. 

Fluctuations of the National Debt. 

Funded Floating 

Debt. Debt. Total. 

1882 11,029 22 ° II > 2 49 

1889-90 12,442 352 12,794 

1890-91 12,634 442 I3,°7 6 

1891-92 12,768 458 13,226 



No. 4-] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 715 
Expenditure on account of National Debt. 

Permanent. Redeemable. Floating Annuities. Total. 

1882 ... 401 70 47 64 581 

1889-90 . . 438 107 85 68 698 

1890-91 . . 442 106 87 69 704 

1891-92 . . 449 105 92 71 717 

Communal and Provincial Debts. 

Communal. Provincial. Total. 

1882 764 137 901 

1889 1,037 x 7° I > 20 7 

Mortgage Debts. 

Bearing Interest. Without Interest. 
1871 6,009 4,583 

1881 6,805 5.°°5 

1891 9>4 6 6 6,152 

State Revenue, showing increase of Taxation. 

1882. 1891-1892. 

State property (including the railways) ... 77 85 

Tax on houses and land 189 191 

Tax on affairs (successions, mortgages, etc.). . 169 220 

Income tax 193 234 

Customs duties, local octrois (salt, tobacco). . 492 577 

Lottery 1 73 74 

Post and telegraph x 44 62 

Various taxes (including tax on annuities) . . 55 71 

Total regular income 1,292 1,514 

Provincial and Communal Revenue, in Totals. 

Communes. Provinces. Total. 

1871 292 75 367 

1882 391 107 498 

1889 5 2 3 io 3 6z6 

Provincial and Communal Revenue, Classified. 

1871. 1882. 1889. 

Taxes on consumption, and similar taxes .100 149 199 

Tax on land and buildings 127 191 202 

Income from the state domain 36 44 47 

Loans, sales of public lands, etc. .... 104 114 178 

Total 367 498 626 

1 The cost of the lottery, in 1891-92, was forty-seven millions ; that of the 
postal and telegraph service was fifty millions. 



716 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

These figures are a little dry, but they are indispensable if 
one wants to form an idea of the state of the country. The 
study of political science has been too long a branch of litera- 
ture ; it is time that it should take as its pattern positive and 
inductive science and adopt the same methods of reasoning. 

Let us try to form an idea of the increase of the burden 
borne by the country, by examining the taxes on consumption; 
and for this purpose let us add together the taxes of this sort 
collected by the state, the communes and the provinces (these 
last are insignificant). We shall find the totals (in millions of 
francs) to be: for 1871,437; for 1882,641; for 1889, 806. 1 
This enormous increase shows us that taxes on consumption 
have furnished the point of least resistance in augmenting the 
revenues. At the same time careful investigations show that 
the wealth of Italy has only very slightly increased from 1882 
to 1889. In some cases (e.g., corn and wool) consumption has 
decreased, so that it cannot be said that the increase of the 
proceeds of the taxes on consumption is due to the prosperity 
of the country ; and we must conclude on the contrary that in 
a great measure, at least, the condition of the people has 
grown worse. 

The straitened circumstances of the country partly account 
for the increase of emigration, 2 which is one of the most serious 
results of the regime described in the preceding pages. It is 
to be anticipated that the situation will grow worse and worse. 
The point of least resistance to taxation continues to be found 

1 The budgets of the communes and of the provinces are made up by calendar 
years (January I to December 31). The same was true of the national budget until 
1884, but since that year it has been computed from July 1 to June 30. In order 
to obtain the total for 1889 I have accordingly taken the averages of the years 
1888-89 and 1889-90. 

2 Emigration is divided into temporary and permanent, but the distinction of 
the two classes in the official statistics is very inaccurate. In order to avoid 
trouble with the authorities, many emigrants say they are going temporarily abroad 
to look for work, and then never return. 

1878. 1880. 1882. 1886. 1888. 1890. 1891. 

Permanent . . 18,535 37,934 65-748 85,355 195.993 i°4.733 i75.5 2 ° 
Temporary. . 77.733 81,967 95,814 82,474 94,743 ii2,5 u »8,in 

Total . . 96,268 119,901 161,562 167,829 290,736 217,244 293,631 



No. 4.] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 717 

in the taxes on consumption, which are rendered heavier by 
protective duties. The landed proprietors are powerful enough 
to resist any increase of taxation upon their property ; they 
have even been able to get the land-tax reduced two-tenths — 
and this at the very time when the expenses of the state 
were increasing in an extraordinary degree and the taxes on 
consumption were being increased in consequence. 1 The 
proprietors of houses have consented to a slight increase in the 
taxation of their property — with the less reluctance because 
this increase is really paid by their tenants in the form of 
increased rents. Moreover, the rent of houses as stated by 
the owners is generally much lower than the real rent, 
and the public authorities connive at such undervaluations. 
Similar abuses exist with regard to the income tax. A few 
years ago the government published a list of the persons paying 
the heaviest income taxes ; and some of the returns are 
absolutely scandalous. Some deputies of the legal profession, 
who, judging from the style in which they live, certainly cannot 
spend less than sixty thousand francs a year, are put down as 
having incomes of twelve thousand francs or less. Those who 
belong to the political coteries of whom we have spoken, also 
enjoy a large degree of immunity from this tax, which accord- 
ingly falls back upon the plain people and on those who enjoy 
no power and no patronage. In the future, perhaps, under the 
pressure of constantly increasing financial necessity, the people 
of importance in the governing class may also be forced to pay. 
This would probably bring about a change in the policy of the 
country. Up to the present time the governing class has not 
opposed the increase of the national expenditures, because they 
have the means of enriching themselves and at the same time 
satisfying their vanity. If they had to pay for this indulgence, 
they would be inclined to renounce it. This contingency, 
however, seems far off. The example of Spain and Portugal 
shows that a Latin country may approach the verge of ruin 





1871. 


1884-85. 


1886-87. 


1887-88. 


1891-1 


Land-tax (in millions) 


. . 128 


125 


116 


106 


107 


House-tax do. 


• • 5' 


65 


67 


68 


84 



718 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

before the governing class renounces the policy which has 
brought it there. I think it much more probable that, if a 
change in Italian policy takes place, it will be partly the result 
of an analogous change in France. 

It is not a mere chance coincidence that the malversations 
of the Bank of Rome in Italy find their counterpart in the 
malversations of the Panama Canal ring in France. In both 
countries we have here similar effects due to similar causes. 
Opportunism in France and Transformism in Italy have their 
sole raison ditre in the benefits they confer on their adherents ; 
and in the long run this system of making use of the resources 
of the country must lead to scandals. The first impulse is to 
blame individuals, but it is the political system which is really 
responsible. Crispi has declared, in an interview, that Tanlongo, 
the director of the Bank of Rome, had no perception of having 
done wrong. This is quite credible. In the long run, every 
sentiment of uprightness and honesty is deadened by living in 
an atmosphere which is morally corrupt. To see every one do 
wrong makes many people believe that wrong-doing is perfectly 
allowable. In France, as in Italy, the scandalous things that 
were being done with impunity were known to the government 
long before the public was aware of them. Among the ministers 
of both countries were men whose private integrity stood above 
all suspicion. Yet it never occurred to them that the first and 
foremost reason for which a government exists is to prevent 
the commission of crimes. They thought of the interest of 
their party, of the success of the form of government which 
they defended — of everything except that in civilized nations 
there are laws for punishing fraud and spoliation, and judges to 
apply these laws. 

Even when the public had learned of the crimes that had 
been committed, the governments, instead of aiding the work 
of justice, tried to impede it. It was only reluctantly, under 
the pressure of public opinion, that it consented to allow the 
prosecution of the criminals ; and then it placed every diffi- 
culty in the application of the law and seemed to have only one 
wish, that of hiding everything, It is perfectly intelligible that 



No. 4.] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 719 

a statesman should try to avoid a scandal which would throw 
discredit on his party and the entire country. Such a sentiment 
is most respectable. But it is hard to understand why this 
same sentiment does not manifest itself when there is still 
time to arrest the offences which are the cause of the 
scandal. 

As long ago as 1879 the Italian government was aware of 
irregular practices on the part of the banks. In a report 
presented to Parliament in that year, Ministers Magliani and 
Maiorana-Calatabiano said : " The difficulties which exist in 
some of the minor establishments may lead to real disasters 
if a serious reform of the present state of things does not take 
place." But the government let ten years pass without 
providing for anything except to obtain funds from the banks 
for its own political needs. Finally, in 1889, an examination 
of the banks was made. That of the Bank of Rome was 
entrusted to Senator Alvisi and J. Biagini, a government 
employee. These gentlemen found a secret and illegal cir- 
culation of 25,976,358 francs in bank-notes, and Alvisi wrote 
in his report : 

The methods of accounting in the Bank of Rome are imperfect, 
its issues are abnormal, its circulation is excessive and partly ficti- 
tious, the general balance-sheet is confused, the notes that are to be 
issued or reserved for renewal are confounded with those kept for 
future illegal circulation. 

With this report under their eyes, the ministers took no steps, 
except to provide that nothing should be made public. 1 We can 
quite understand why the government did not deem it advisable 
to punish the offense already committed ; but why did it not do 
something to prevent further offenses ? As a matter of fact its 
attitude was worse than passive : it facilitated these crimes 

x On the 22d of February, 1893, Sig. Maggiorino Ferraris (a deputy and some- 
time reporter of the parliamentary commission which in 1889, after the report of 
Alvisi, examined the proposed laws regulating the circulation of the Roman bank- 
notes) said in the Chamber of Deputies : " The president of the council [Giolitti] 
is not unaware that, to my great grief, the government of that time, of which he 
was a member and which he represented on the commission, being regularly 
present . . . knowingly gave false documents to the commission." 



720 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY. [Vol. VIII. 

which it could not ignore by relieving the Bank of Rome from 
the obligation of redeeming its notes ; and but for the cou- 
rageous opposition of Sig. Colajanni in the Chamber, the 
government would have passed a law prolonging for six years 
the legal-tender quality of bank-notes, including those of the 
Bank of Rome. In 1891 this institution found itself embar- 
rassed by its clandestine circulation. It did not know how 
to redeem its notes. The government already permitted the 
banks to refuse redemption of their notes as far as the public 
was concerned, but they still had to redeem them in making 
settlements with each other ; this in Italian is called riscon- 
trata. The government, to aid the Bank of Rome, issued 
a royal decree, August 30, 1891, abolishing this riscontrata ; 
and so the bank was able to continue its clandestine issue. 
Another year and a half passed and on the 6th of December, 
1892, the government presented a bill prolonging for another 
six years the legal-tender quality of the bank-notes and main- 
taining the abolition of the riscontrata. At the same time 
Tanlongo, the director of the Bank of Rome, was appointed 
a member of the Senate. On the 20th of December, 1892, 
when Sig. Colajanni spoke of the irregularities of the bank, 
Minister Giolitti denied that there was anything abnormal 
in its management. He further said, apropos of Alvisi's 
report : "The thing seemed so little exceptional that I must 
confess I never even read that report." But this was not 
true. Crispi contradicted the statement, and confirmed his 
contradiction in the Chamber, February 22, 1893, by reading 
from his note-book the following entry, dated June 14, 1890 : 

Giolitti comes to me ; we speak of the banks. . . . The Roman 
bank was severely censured by Giolitti ; he declared that the facts 
discovered in the inspection offer material for the court of assizes. 

Giolitti did not dispute Crispi's correction. He replied : 
" I do not remember exactly the words I used, but since Crispi 
affirms them, it is the same as if I remembered them." Then 
he excused himself by saying that he had been told that 
everything had been put in order at the Roman Bank. But 



No. 4.] PARLIAMENTARY GOVERNMENT IN ITALY. 72 1 

he did not explain why he felt no necessity for verifying what 
had been told him before proposing a bill for the extension of 
the legal tender and before appointing Tanlongo senator. 

In many respects, as I have said, the Italian bank scandal 
and the French Panama scandal are comparable phenomena. 
But if the French nation is often afflicted with the same evils 
that trouble its brothers of the Latin race, it distinguishes 
itself by a great energy of reaction. It has a more vigorous 
constitution; and up to the present time, at least, it bears its 
illnesses like a young man to whom they are a momentary crisis, 
not like an old man who can oppose no resistance to disease. 
It may be that the spectacle of the immorality of a certain 
class, which has been revealed by the Panama affair, may 
produce a considerable change, at least for the moment, in the 
proceedings of the French government ; but it cannot at 
present be foreseen what the change will be. 

Notwithstanding the German alliance, the example of France 
exercises a great influence in Italy. The greater number of 
persons who submit to this influence do so unconsciously ; but 
this does not make the influence any the less real. In Italy 
more French books are read than Italian, while German books 
are scarcely read at all. France still preserves in great part an 
intellectual supremacy over the Latin race by its literature, its 
theatres, its science, by personal contact, by the attraction 
which Paris exercises, and by its affinity of race and character. 
It is therefore probable that if the parliamentary regime of 
these nations is to be modified, the modification will begin 
in France and extend thence to the other Latin countries. 
But whether future modifications will alleviate or augment 
the evils that spring from the present regime, the future alone 
will disclose. 

VlLFREDO PARETO. 

Florence, 1893. 



